Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB700.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1729-E(b) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended to read:Section 1729-E. Department of Human Services.* * *(b) Home and Community-Based Services for Individuals with Intellectual Disabilities Augmentation Account.--(1) A restricted account is established in the General Fund to be known as the Home and Community-Based Services for Individuals with Intellectual Disabilities Augmentation Account.(2) Money in the account shall not lapse.(3) The following shall be deposited in the account:(i) The net proceeds of the sale of real property which served as a state center for individuals with intellectual disabilities.(ii) An annual transfer from the General Fund to the account in accordance with the following:(A) If the amount of the appropriation for state centers for individuals with intellectual disabilities in a fiscal year is less than the amount of [the] an appropriation for [the] a prior fiscal year, the Secretary of the Budget shall certify the difference as the amount to be transferred.(A.1) For each fiscal year after the sale of real property which served as a state center for individuals with intellectual disabilities, the secretary shall certify the amount of maintenance 20250HB0700PN0720 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 costs, upkeep and operational costs that would otherwise have been expended for the state center for individuals with intellectual disabilities had it remained open and operational. The amount certified under this clause shall be transferred.(B) [The] A transfer under this subparagraph shall be made no later than last day of the first quarter of a fiscal year.(iii) Any amounts appropriated or transferred to the account.(4) Money in the account is hereby appropriated to the Department of Human Services to provide home and community-based supports, including quality direct support professional capacity, to provide housing supports for individuals with intellectual disabilities and to provide home and community-based supports for people on the emergency waiting list as of the first day of a fiscal year as determined by the department after receiving input from the Office of Developmental Programs and the Information Sharing and Advisory Committee.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025, or immediately, whichever is later.20250HB0700PN0720 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122